New Jersey, session 221, S3795.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  A health care facility, licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.), shall be permitted to employ a certified or conditionally certified nurse aide in the capacity of a personal care assistant. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.